Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5981.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2111f. (1) Before July 1, 2020, an insurer that offers automobile insurance in this state shall file premium rates for personal protection insurance coverage for automobile insurance policies effective after July 1, 2020. (2) Subject to subsections (6) and (7), the premium rates filed as required by subsection (1), and any subsequent premium rates filed by the insurer for personal protection insurance coverage under automobile insurance policies effective before July 2, 2028, must result, as nearly as practicable, in an average reduction per vehicle from the premium rates for personal protection insurance coverage that were in effect for the insurer on May 1, 2019 as follows: (a) For policies subject to the coverage limits under section 3107c(1)(a), an average 45% or greater reduction per vehicle. (b) For policies subject to the coverage limits under section 3107c(1)(b), an average 35% or greater reduction per vehicle. (c) For policies subject to the coverage limits under section 3107c(1)(c), an average 20% or greater reduction per vehicle. (d) For policies not subject to any coverage limit under section 3107c(1)(d), an average 10% or greater reduction per vehicle. (3) For a policy under which an election under section 3107d has been made to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a), or for a policy to which an exclusion under section 3109a(2) applies, the premium rates filed under subsection (1), and any subsequent premium rates filed by the insurer for personal protection insurance coverage, must result in no premium charge for coverage for personal protection insurance benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a). (4) The director shall review a filing submitted by an insurer under subsections (1) to (3) for compliance with this section. Subject to subsection (7), the director shall disapprove a filing if after review the director determines that the filing does not result in the premium reductions required by subsections (2) and (3). (5) If the director disapproves a premium rate filing under subsection (4), the insurer shall submit a revised premium rate filing to the director within not more than 15 days after the disapproval. The premium rate filing is subject to review in the same manner as an original premium rate filing under subsection (4). (6) For policies issued or renewed in the year beginning July 1, 2024 and in the year beginning July 1, 2026, an automobile insurer that offers automobile insurance in this state shall make filings demonstrating its compliance with this section. (7) At any time, an insurer may apply to the director for approval to file rates that result in a lower premium reduction level or an exemption from the requirements of subsection (2) and the director shall approve the application if the rates otherwise comply with this act and compliance with the premium reductions required by subsection (2) will result in any of the following: (a) The the insurer reaching the company action level risk-based capital. (b) A violation of the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution as to the insurer. This subdivision does not apply after July 1, 2023. (c) A violation of section 17 of article I of the state constitution of 1963, as to deprivation of property without due process. This subdivision does not apply after July 1, 2023. (8) An insurer shall pass on, in filings to which this section applies, savings realized from the application of section 3157(2) to (12) (14) to treatment, products, services, accommodations, or training rendered to individuals who suffered accidental bodily injury from motor vehicle accidents that occurred before July 2, 2021. An insurer shall provide the director with all documents and information requested by the director that the director determines are necessary to allow the director to evaluate the insurer's compliance with this subsection. After July 1, 2022, the director shall review all rate filings to which this section applies for compliance with this subsection. (9) This section does not prohibit an increase for any individual insurance policy premium if the increase results from applying rating factors as approved under this chapter, including the requirements of this section. (10) After July 1, 2020 and before July 2, 2028, an insurer shall not issue or renew an automobile insurance policy in this state unless the premium rates filed by the insurer for personal protection insurance coverage are approved under this section. (11) For purposes of calculating a personal protection insurance premium or premium rate under this section, the premium must include the catastrophic claims assessment imposed under section 3104. (12) If subsection (2) or the application of subsection (2) to any insurer is found to be invalid by a court, the remaining portions of the amendatory act that added this section 2019 PA 21 and 2019 PA 22 are not severable and shall must be deemed invalid and inoperable. (13) As used in this section: (a) "Authorized control level RBC" means the number determined under the risk-based capital formula in accordance with the RBC report, including risk-based capital instructions adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and the director. (b) "Company action level risk-based capital" means 2 times the insurer's authorized control level RBC. (c) "RBC report" means the report of the insurer's RBC levels as required by the annual statement instructions. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04503'25) or House Bill No. 5501 (request no. H04503'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.